California, session 20252026, AB1145.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21104 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:21104. No (a) An ordinance or resolution proposed to be enacted under Section 21101 or subdivision (d) of Section 21100 is not effective as to any highway not under the exclusive jurisdiction of the local authority enacting the same, except that an ordinance or resolution which is submitted to the Department of Transportation by a local legislative body in complete draft form for approval authority for approval, in complete form and prior to the enactment thereof of the ordinance or resolution, is effective as to any state highway or part thereof specified in the written approval of the department.(b) The Department of Transportation shall do both of the following when reviewing, and approving or rejecting, a proposed ordinance or resolution that has been submitted to the department for approval by a local authority pursuant to subdivision (a):(1) Consider the costs of the proposed ordinance or resolution compared to any possible alternative solution to the issue that the proposed ordinance or resolution is addressing.(2) If the department rejects the proposed ordinance or resolution, provide written reasons and justifications for the rejection to the submitting local authority.This(c) This section does not preclude the application of an ordinance or resolution adopted under Section 21101 or subdivision (d) of Section 21100 to streets maintained by a community services district organized pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 61000) of Title 6 of the Government Code. An ordinance or resolution enacted by a local authority pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 21101 may impose a fine or penalty of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for a violation of this code.SECTION 1.Section 98 is added to the Streets and Highways Code, to read:98.(a)The department shall, on or before December 31, 2027, conduct a study on highway safety on State Highway Route 74. The study shall collect all available data over the preceding 10 years, including, but not limited to, all of the following data:(1)The number of accidents, including fatal and nonfatal accidents.(2)The number of 911 calls related to tire blowouts due to potholes or other poor road conditions.(3)The number of incidents involving truck tractors.(4)The number and types of citations issued for violations of the Vehicle Code, including, but not limited to, weight-limit violations.(5)The number of injuries and fatalities.(6)The number of instances in which an accident was caused by brake failure.(7)All of the following relating to enforcement facilities:(A)The identification of transportation corridors used to bypass enforcement facilities.(B)The resulting dangers, hazards, poor road conditions, and other consequences of the transportation corridors identified pursuant to subparagraph (A).(C)The identification of hot spots on the corridors identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) and the enforcement facilities being bypassed.(b)As part of the study required pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall develop recommendations to improve highway safety on State Highway Route 74, including recommendations on how to address enforcement facility bypassing on roadways other than State Highway Route 74, which shall include, but is not limited to, recommendations relating to increased enforcement, road safety projects, and road maintenance projects.(c)The department shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature on or before December 31, 2027, consistent with the requirements of Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d)This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.